Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 238

Governance

48-238-101. Management — Authorized signature.

Management.

If the LLC is member-managed, all powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the business and affairs of the LLC shall be managed by or under the direction of its members.

If the LLC is board-managed, all powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the business and affairs of the LLC shall be managed by or under the direction of the board of governors, subject to subsection (b) and any limitations set forth in the articles or operating agreement. An LLC shall be either member-managed or board-managed, as designated in its articles. Unless otherwise provided in the articles or operating agreement, each governor shall have equal voting power per capita with each other governor.

Authorized Signature. For convenience, one (1) or more managers, members or governors may be designated in the articles as persons authorized to execute instruments transferring real property held in the name of the LLC and may set forth any limitations on such authority. This designation, however, in the absence of a clear statement that the named person or persons are the only person or persons authorized to execute instruments transferring real property, does not imply that other members, managers or governors do not have the authority to execute such instruments under § 48-238-103 or § 48-238-104. A grant of authority contained in the current articles is conclusive in favor of a person who gives value without knowledge to the contrary.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1995, ch. 403, §§ 50-52.

Law Reviews.

Delaware LLCs for Tennessee Lawyers? (Richard Spore), 35 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1999).

48-238-102. [Reserved.]

Unless the articles otherwise provide, if an LLC is member-managed, every member is an agent of the LLC for the purpose of its business, and the act of every member, including the execution in the LLC name of any instrument, for apparently carrying on in the usual way the business of the LLC of which such member is a member, binds the LLC, unless the member so acting has in fact no authority to act for the LLC in the particular matter, and the person with whom the member is dealing has knowledge of the fact that the member has no such authority.

An act of a member which is not apparently for carrying on of the business of the LLC in the usual way does not bind the LLC unless authorized by the other members.

Unless authorized by the other members, no single member or group of members less than all the members shall have authority to:

Dispose of the goodwill of the business;

Do any other act which would make it impossible to carry on the ordinary business of the LLC;

Confess a judgment; or

Submit an LLC claim or liability to arbitration or reference.

No act of a member in contravention of a restriction on such member's authority shall bind the LLC to persons having knowledge of the restriction.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Delaware LLCs for Tennessee Lawyers? (Richard Spore), 35 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1999).

48-238-104. Agency of members in a board-managed LLC.

Unless the articles provide otherwise, if the LLC is board-managed, no member is an agent of the LLC for the purpose of its business, other than a member designated by the board of governors, including the execution in the LLC name of any instrument, for apparently carrying on in the usual way the business of the LLC of which such person is a member, does not bind the LLC, unless the member so acting has in fact the authority to act for the LLC in the particular matter.

Unless the articles provide otherwise, if the LLC is board-managed, the following persons are agents of the LLC and may legally bind the LLC, subject to the limitation on such persons contained in chapters 201-248 of this title:

The chief manager;

A person designated in the articles or the operating agreement as being so authorized; and

A person designated in writing by action of the governors as being so authorized.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1; 1999, ch. 455, § 20.

48-238-103. Agency of members in a member-managed LLC.